Utah statutes.
78A-6-507.   Grounds for termination of parental rights -- Findings
regarding reasonable efforts.
(1)  The court may terminate all parental rights with respect to a parent if
the court finds any one of the following:
(a)  that the parent has abandoned the child;
(b)  that the parent has neglected or abused the child;
(c)  that the parent is unfit or incompetent;
(d) (i)  that the child is being cared for in an out-of-home placement under
the supervision of the court or the division;
(ii)  that the parent has substantially neglected, wilfully refused, or has
been unable or unwilling to remedy the circumstances that cause the child to
be in an out-of-home placement; and
(iii)  that there is a substantial likelihood that the parent will not be
capable of exercising proper and effective parental care in the near future;
(e)  failure of parental adjustment, as defined in this chapter;
(f)  that only token efforts have been made by the parent:
(i)  to support or communicate with the child;
(ii)  to prevent neglect of the child;
(iii)  to eliminate the risk of serious harm to the child; or
(iv)  to avoid being an unfit parent;
(g) (i)  that the parent has voluntarily relinquished the parent's parental
rights to the child; and
(ii)  that termination is in the child's best interest;
(h)  that, after a period of trial during which the child was returned to live
in the child's own home, the parent substantially and continuously or
repeatedly refused or failed to give the child proper parental care and
protection; or
(i)  the terms and conditions of safe relinquishment of a newborn child have
been complied with, pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Part 8, Safe
Relinquishment of a Newborn Child.
(2)  The court may not terminate the parental rights of a parent because the
parent has failed to complete the requirements of a child and family plan.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), in any case in which the
court has directed the division to provide reunification services to a parent,
the court must find that the division made reasonable efforts to provide those
services before the court may terminate the parent's rights under Subsection
(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (h).
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), the court is not required to make the
finding under Subsection (3)(a) before terminating a parent's rights:
(i)  under Subsection (1)(b), if the court finds that the abuse or neglect
occurred subsequent to adjudication; or
(ii)  if reasonable efforts to provide the services described in Subsection
(3)(a) are not required under federal law.
